West Virginia, session 2026, HB4703.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Medicaid program; coverage of compressions and braces. (a) Any enrollee in Medicaid who is eligible for services and who has a diagnosis of lymphedema shall receive coverage for lymphedema compression treatment items, such as standard and custom fitted gradient compression garments, lymphedema pumps, and other items as determined by the Bureau for Medical Services. (b) Any enrollee in Medicaid who is eligible for services and who has been diagnosed with an orthopedic issue that requires a brace shall receive coverage for custom-fitted and off-the-shelf orthopedic braces. (c) If required, the Bureau for Medical Services shall requite federal approval through a state plan amendment, wavier, or other means to effectuate coverage of the items listed in subsections (a) and (b).